Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2-301.7] Conduct of
examinations. (a) Upon determining that an examination should be
conducted, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall issue an
examination warrant appointing one or more examiners to perform the examination
and instructing them as to the scope of the examination. In conducting the
examination, the examiners shall observe those guidelines and procedures set
forth in the examiners' handbook adopted by the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners. The commissioner may also employ such other
guidelines or procedures as the commissioner may deem appropriate.

(b) Every company or person from whom
information is sought, including its officers, directors, and agents, shall
provide to the examiners appointed under subsection (a) timely, convenient, and
free access at all reasonable hours at its offices to all books, records,
accounts, papers, documents, and any or all computer or other recordings
relating to the property, assets, business, and affairs of the company being
examined. The officers, directors, employees, and agents of the company or
person shall facilitate the examination and aid in the examination insofar as
it is in their power to do so. The refusal of any company, by its officers,
directors, employees, or agents, to submit to examination or to comply with any
reasonable written request of the examiners shall be grounds for suspension or
refusal of, or nonrenewal of, any license or authority held by the company to
engage in an insurance or other business subject to the commissioner's
jurisdiction. Any such proceedings for suspension, revocation, or refusal of
any license or authority shall be conducted pursuant to section 431:3-217.

(c) The commissioner or any authorized
examiner shall have the power to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and examine
under oath any person as to any matter pertinent to the examination. Upon the
failure or refusal of any person to obey a subpoena, the subpoena may be
enforced pursuant to section 431:2-207.

(d) When conducting an examination, the
commissioner may retain attorneys, appraisers, independent actuaries,
independent certified public accountants, or other professionals and
specialists as examiners, the cost of which shall be borne by the company that
is the subject of the examination.

(e) Nothing contained in this part shall be
construed to limit the commissioner's authority to terminate or suspend any
examination in order to pursue other legal or regulatory action pursuant to the
insurance laws of this State. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant
to any examination shall be prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory
action.

(f) Nothing contained in this part shall be
construed to limit the commissioner's authority to use and, if appropriate, to
make public any final or preliminary examination report, any examiner or
company workpapers, or other documents, or any other information discovered or
developed during the course of any examination in the furtherance of any legal
or regulatory action that the commissioner may, in the commissioner's sole
discretion, deem appropriate. [L 1993, c 321, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next